New York, session 2025-2026, A6258.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 112 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. (a) The commissioner shall establish a contraband screening plan 4 which shall include, but not be limited to: 5 (i) the use of a leashed and controlled canine trained to detect ille- 6 gal drugs at the entrance of each correctional facility; 7 (ii) the search of visitors, correctional staff, bags and other items 8 entering the facility which may include, but not be limited to, elec- 9 tronic searches, metal detectors, pat searches, visual searches of oral 10 cavities, and any other legal technology at the commissioner's 11 discretion; 12 (iii) the training of staff on up to date and current contraband 13 screening procedures; and 14 (iv) a third-party secure vendor mail program to be utilized for the 15 delivery of all non-privileged correspondence to incarcerated individ- 16 uals including but not limited to, the order and delivery of all 17 products to incarcerated individuals housed at correctional facilities. 18 (b) The commissioner shall provide a copy of such contraband screening 19 plan as well as the prior year's plan including but not limited to 20 results of the canine assignments, number of attempts to promote contra- 21 band, including data on contraband confiscated through the third-party 22 secure vendor mail program and the number of urine tests and their EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06986-01-5 A. 6258 2 1 results conducted statewide by facilities to the legislature by December 2 thirty-first each year. 3 (c) The commissioner may promulgate any rules and regulations neces- 4 sary to implement the provisions of this subdivision. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.